Mississippi, session 2026, SB3112.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  As used in this section: (a)  "Charter boat operator" means an individual who operates a vessel for hire, guiding sports fishermen for a fee and is duly licensed to engage in such activity in the State of Mississippi. (b)  "Commercial fisherman" means a fisherman who sells, barters or exchanges any or all of his catch or who is paid for attempting to catch marine species, and is duly licensed to engage in commercial fishing. (2)  For any taxpayer that is a charter boat operator or a commercial fisherman, there shall be allowed as a credit against the taxes imposed by Section 27-7-5, an amount equal to taxes paid under Sections 27-55-519 and 27-55-521 on the purchase of fuel used on bodies of water, rather than on roads or highways. (3)  Any credit claimed under this section but not used in any tax year may be carried forward for five (5) consecutive years from the close of the tax year in which the credit was earned.  The credit that may be utilized in any tax year shall be limited to an amount not greater than the total state income tax liability of the taxpayer for that year. (4)  A taxpayer shall apply for credits with the department on forms prescribed by the department.  In the application, the taxpayer shall certify the dollar amount of the fuel taxes paid during the calendar year for which the credit is claimed, shall provide a copy of a current charter boat operator or commercial fishing license, and shall furnish such other information or documentation as required by the department.  The department may promulgate regulations as needed to administer this section. SECTION 2.  Section 1 of this act shall be codified in Article 1, Chapter 7, Title 27, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after January 1, 2026.